incubator/apertium-liv-fin/apertium-liv-fin.liv.lexc
LEXICON N_RADIO !!= @CODE@ : 91
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ANG !!= @CODE@ : 92
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KOUV !!= @CODE@ : 93
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KAND-PL !!= @CODE@ : 94
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KAND !!= @CODE@ : 94
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_PȮRT !!= @CODE@ : 95
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_NUŖM !!= @CODE@ : 96
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LAINT !!= @CODE@ : 97
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LOUL !!= @CODE@ : 98
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_UL !!= @CODE@ : 99
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PAN !!= @CODE@ : 100
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TÄM !!= @CODE@ täm:tam 101 
%<n%>: NMN_TÄM    ;


LEXICON N_NIŖȚ !!= @CODE@ : 102
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KUĻ !!= @CODE@ : 103
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PAŅ !!= @CODE@ : 104
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_DAŅTŠ !!= @CODE@ : 105
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KOUŠ !!= @CODE@ : 106
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SPLEIŠ !!= @CODE@ : 107
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VEIS !!= @CODE@ : 108
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PȮIS !!= @CODE@ : 109
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KIĻG !!= @CODE@ : 110
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VȮĻG !!= @CODE@ : 111
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TÄUŽ !!= @CODE@ täuž: adres 112
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VAŖŽ !!= @CODE@ : 113
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PIERZ !!= @CODE@ : 114
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VÕRGÕ !!= @CODE@ : 115
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ !!= @CODE@ : 116
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VȬIDAG !!= @CODE@ : 117
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SIELDÕ !!= @CODE@ : 118
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SIELDÕ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 118
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_NǬʼGÕ !!= @CODE@ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_NǬʼGÕ-PL	!!= @CODE@ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ !!= @CODE@ : 120
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 120
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_DRŪʼOŠÕ !!= @CODE@ drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SOʼV !!= @CODE@ : 122
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SOʼV-PL !!= @CODE@ : 122
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KǬJ !!= @CODE@ : 123
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KǬJ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 123
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_ǬʼJ !!= @CODE@ ǭʼj:ǭj 124
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_IRM !!= @CODE@ : 125
%<n%>:	NMN_IRM	  ;

LEXICON N_IRM-PL !!= @CODE@ : 125
%<n%>:     NMN_IRM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KIM !!= @CODE@ : 126
%<n%>:	NMN_IRM	;

LEXICON N_KIM-SG !!= @CODE@ : 126
%<n%>:     NMN_IRM-SG   ;

LEXICON N_KIM-PL !!= @CODE@ : 126
%<n%>:     NMN_IRM-PL   ;


LEXICON N_VȮŅ !!= @CODE@ : 127
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VAʼIT !!= @CODE@ vaʼit:vait 128
%<n%>:	NMN_IRM	;

LEXICON N_VAʼIT-PL	!!= @CODE@ vaʼit:vait 128
%<n%>:     NMN_IRM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AMĀT !!= @CODE@ : 129
%<n%>:	NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_AMĀT-PL !!= @CODE@ : 129
%<n%>:     NMN_AMĀT-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KULTŪR !!= @CODE@ : 130
%<n%>:	NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_SAʼGDIT !!= @CODE@ saʼgdit:sagdit 131
%<n%>:	NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_VIĻȚ !!= @CODE@ : 132
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VIĻȚ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 132
%<n%>:     CASES   ;


LEXICON N_EĻ !!= @CODE@ : 133
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ !!= @CODE@ blēʼḑ:blēḑ 134
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_FAKT !!= @CODE@ : 135
%<n%>:	NMN_FAKT	;

LEXICON N_FAKT-PL !!= @CODE@ : 135
%<n%>:     NMN_FAKT-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TAS !!= @CODE@ : 136
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_NEITST !!= @CODE@ neitst:neits 137
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SĪEND !!= @CODE@ : 138
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LǞʼND !!= @CODE@ lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĀIGAST !!= @CODE@ : 140
%<n%>:	NMN_ĀIGAST   ;

LEXICON N_ĀIGAST-PL !!= @CODE@ : 140
%<n%>:	NMN_ĀIGAST-PL	;

LEXICON N_ANALĪZ !!= @CODE@ : 141
%<n%>: 	NMN_ĀIGAST ;

LEXICON N_NĪʼEM !!= @CODE@ nīʼem:nīem 142
%<n%>: 	NMN_ĀIGAST ;

LEXICON N_JAĻKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 143
%<n%>:	NMN_JAĻKŠ	;

LEXICON N_JAĻKŠ-PL	!!= @CODE@ : 143
%<n%>:     NMN_JAĻKŠ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VIŠ !!= @CODE@ : 144
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_RŪʼTŠ !!= @CODE@ rūʼtš:rūtš 145
%<n%>:	NMN_RŪʼTŠ	;

LEXICON N_RŪʼTŠ-PL !!= @CODE@ rūʼtš:rūtš 145
%<n%>:     NMN_RŪʼTŠ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TĒʼḐ !!= @CODE@ tēʼḑ:tēḑ 146
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LĒʼḐ !!= @CODE@ lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LĒʼḐ-PL !!= @CODE@ lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KĪNTŠ !!= @CODE@ : 148
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KǬŅTŠ !!= @CODE@ : 149
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LĒŅTŠ !!= @CODE@ : 150
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LĪEM !!= @CODE@ : 151
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_AʼM !!= @CODE@ aʼm:am 152
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_AZŪM !!= @CODE@ : 153
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_AZŪM-PL !!= @CODE@ : 153
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM !!= @CODE@ : 154
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM-PL !!= @CODE@ : 154
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KǬŅIM !!= @CODE@ : 155
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĒTAM !!= @CODE@ : 156
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĒTAM-PL !!= @CODE@ : 156
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_SIDĀM !!= @CODE@ : 157
%<n%>:	NMN_SIDĀM	;

LEXICON N_SIDĀM-PL	!!= @CODE@ : 157
%<n%>:     NMN_SIDĀM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TŪOITÕG !!= @CODE@ : 158
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KǬRAND !!= @CODE@ : 159
%<n%>:	NMN_KǬRAND	;

LEXICON N_KǬRAND-SG !!= @CODE@ : 159
%<n%>:	NMN_KǬRAND-SG	;

LEXICON N_KǬRAND-PL !!= @CODE@ : 159
%<n%>:     NMN_KǬRAND-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ȬʼDÕG !!= @CODE@ ȭʼdõg:ȭdõg 160
%<n%>:	NMN_ȬʼDÕG	;

LEXICON N_TAPTÕD !!= @CODE@ : 161
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TĪʼEDÕD !!= @CODE@ tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON Num-VĪDÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 163
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TUOISTÕNZ !!= @CODE@ : 164
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ !!= @CODE@ īʼdõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MĪEZ !!= @CODE@ : 166
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ROʼVZ !!= @CODE@ : 167
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KÄBRĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 168
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MAIGĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 169
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_NÕTKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 170
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_RIKĀZ !!= @CODE@ rikāz: 171
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_RIKĀZ-PL !!= @CODE@ rikāz: 171
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 172
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ-SG !!= @CODE@ : 172
%<n%>:	SG-CASES	;

LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 172
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_ĀMBAZ !!= @CODE@ : 173
%<n%>:	NMN_ĀMBAZ	;

LEXICON N_ĀMBAZ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 173
%<n%>:     NMN_ĀMBAZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PŪŖAZ !!= @CODE@ : 174
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PǬĻAZ !!= @CODE@ : 175
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_RĒNAZ !!= @CODE@ : 176
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_RĒNAZ-PL	!!= @CODE@ : 176
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_TŌVAZ !!= @CODE@ : 177
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PŪORAZ !!= @CODE@ pūoraz: 178
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MÕTKÕZ !!= @CODE@ mõtkõz: 179
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MÕTKÕZ-PL !!= @CODE@ mõtkõz: 179
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ !!= @CODE@ vȭrõz: 180
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ-PL !!= @CODE@ vȭrõz: 180
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 181
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 181
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_ÄʼGGÕZ !!= @CODE@ äʼggõz:äggõz 182
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL !!= @CODE@ äʼggõz:äggõz 182
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_PŪʼDÕZ !!= @CODE@ pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PŪʼDÕZ-PL !!= @CODE@ pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_VĪETŠÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 184
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VĪETŠÕZ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 184
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_LǬʼTŠÕZ !!= @CODE@ lǭʼtšõz:lǭtšõz 185
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SĒJI !!= @CODE@ : 186
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_AKKIJI !!= @CODE@ : 187
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_AKKIJI-PL !!= @CODE@ : 187
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_LĒʼJI !!= @CODE@ lēʼji:lēji 188
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TUĻĻI !!= @CODE@ : 189
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LÄʼBḐI !!= @CODE@ läʼbḑi:läbḑi 190
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_NAI !!= @CODE@ : 191
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_AʼIGI !!= @CODE@ aʼigi:aigi 192
%<n%>:	NMN_AʼIGI	;

LEXICON N_AʼIGI-PL	!!= @CODE@ aʼigi:aigi 192
%<n%>:     NMN_AʼIGI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PUʼNNI !!= @CODE@ puʼnni:punni 193
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PUʼNNI-PL !!= @CODE@ puʼnni:punni 193
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KAȚKI !!= @CODE@ kațki: 194
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KUKKI !!= @CODE@ kukki: 195
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_AIGI !!= @CODE@ aigi:aigi 196
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_OUKI !!= @CODE@ : 197
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PAŖĪ !!= @CODE@ : 198
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON nouns
bikšāz:bikšā N_BIKŠĀZ-SG   ; !"XX"
bril:bril N_KIM-SG   ; !"XX"
bēʼrõd:bēʼr N_VAʼIT-PL   ; !"XX"
dillõd:dil N_KIM-PL   ; !"XX"
fekālõd:fekāl N_AMĀT-PL   ; !"XX"
jetmõd:jetīm N_VÕȚĪM-PL   ; !"XX"
jõugõd:jõugõd N_JÕUGÕ   ; !"XX"
jǭņõd:jǭņ N_VIĻȚ-PL   ; !"juhannus"
kikbikšõd:kik#bikšā N_BIKŠĀZ-PL   ; !"XX"
kiļg:kiļg N_KIĻG   ; !"XX"
kouv:kouv N_KOUV   ; !"XX"
kǭtšõd:kǭtšõ N_VĪETŠÕZ-PL   ; !"XX"
kǭņim:kǭņim N_KǬŅIM   ; !"XX"
lejākīņtš:lejā#kīņtš N_KĪNTŠ   ; !"XX"
lil:lil N_UL   ; !"XX"
lēņtš:lēņtš N_LĒŅTŠ   ; !"XX"
lēʼtšõd:lēʼtš N_RŪʼTŠ-PL   ; !"XX"
lǭņtš:lǭņtš N_KǬŅTŠ   ; !"XX"
mustāaʼm:mustā#aʼm N_AʼM   ; !"XX"
mõrtš:mõrtš N_DAŅTŠ   ; !"XX"
mīnus:mīnus N_TŪOITÕG   ; !"XX"
mǭŗadlīem:mǭŗad#līem N_LĪEM   ; !"XX"
noʼugõd:noʼugõ N_NǬʼGÕ-PL   ; !"XX"
oʼvkūʼoḑ:oʼv#kūʼoḑ N_BLĒʼḐ   ; !"XX"
oʼvvǟʼrõd:oʼv#vǟʼrõ N_PŪʼDÕZ-PL   ; !"XX"
paint:paint N_LAINT   ; !"XX"
paprik:paprik N_ĀIGAST   ; !"XX"
papārd:papār N_SIDĀM-PL   ; !"XX"
paņ:paņ N_PAŅ   ; !"XX"
periōd:periōd N_ANALĪZ   ; !"XX"
periōdik:periōdik N_AMĀT   ; !"XX"
pierz:pierz N_PIERZ   ; !"XX"
pivādȭʼdõg:pivād#ȭʼdõg N_ȬʼDÕG   ; !"XX"
piʼņlil:piʼņ#lil N_UL   ; !"XX"
plur:plur N_KIM   ; !"XX"
plēšõd:plēš N_JAĻKŠ-PL   ; !"XX"
pušmõz:pušmõ N_MÕTKÕZ   ; !"XX"
põrm:põrm N_IRM   ; !"XX"
põzāgõd:põzāgõ N_ARĀGÕZ-PL   ; !"XX"
pūolpǭļaz:pūol#pǭļa N_PǬĻAZ   ; !"XX"
pūoraz:pūora N_PŪORAZ   ; !"XX"
pȯis:pȯis N_PȮIS   ; !"poika"
pȯrt:pȯrt N_PȮRT   ; !"XX"
radio:radio N_RADIO   ; !"XX"
rattõdraʼj:rattõd#raʼj N_SOʼV   ; !"XX"
reinõd:rēna N_RĒNAZ-PL   ; !"XX"
rejāvaŗž:rejā#vaŗž N_VAŖŽ   ; !"XX"
reḑḑõlambõd:reḑḑõl#āmba N_ĀMBAZ-PL   ; !"XX"
roʼvd:roʼv N_SOʼV-PL   ; !"XX"
roʼvloul:roʼv#loul N_LOUL   ; !"XX"
roʼvz:roʼv N_ROʼVZ   ; !"XX"
ruʼisk:ruʼisk N_NĪʼEM   ; !"XX"
rīemgõz:rīemgõ N_VȬRÕZ   ; !"halava"
rīʼjǭʼj:rīʼj#ǭʼj N_ǬʼJ   ; !"XX"
rūʼtš:rūʼtš N_RŪʼTŠ   ; !"XX"
rǭj:rǭj N_KǬJ   ; !"XX"
rǭntõdloutš:rǭntõd#loutš N_KOUŠ   ; !"XX"
sadāāigastõd:sadā#āigast N_ĀIGAST-PL   ; !"XX"
saņț:saņț N_NIŖȚ   ; !"XX"
saʼgdit:saʼgdit N_SAʼGDIT   ; !"XX"
sigānǭʼgõ:sigā#nǭʼgõ N_NǬʼGÕ   ; !"XX"
sindi$$tēʼḑ:sindi$$tēʼḑ N_TĒʼḐ   ; !"XX"
skǭḑ:skǭḑ N_VIĻȚ   ; !"XX"
spleiš:spleiš N_SPLEIŠ   ; !"XX"
strǭiptõd:strǭiptõd N_TAPTÕD   ; !"XX"
studijõd:studij N_KǬJ-PL   ; !"XX"
suodārattõd:suodā#ratā N_RIKĀZ-PL   ; !"XX"
suoŗm:suoŗm N_NUŖM   ; !"sormi"
sõʼbritsiʼdmõd:sõʼbrit#siʼdūm N_AZŪM-PL   ; !"XX"
sõʼvvineitst:sõʼvvi#neitst N_NEITST   ; !"XX"
sīedõbāmbaz:sīedõb#āmba N_ĀMBAZ   ; !"XX"
sīpõltāimõd:sīpõl#tāim N_KAND-PL   ; !"XX"
sūlaʼggõd:sū#laʼggõ N_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL   ; !"XX"
sūrpūŗaz:sūr#pūŗa N_PŪŖAZ   ; !"XX"
tabāk:tabāk N_KULTŪR   ; !"XX"
tas:tas N_TAS   ; !"XX"
taņgõd:taņg N_FAKT-PL   ; !"XX"
tigīm:tigīm N_AZŪM   ; !"XX"
toļ:toļ N_KUĻ   ; !"XX"
toņ:toņ N_EĻ   ; !"XX"
traktor:traktor N_KǬRAND   ; !"XX"
transportvaʼidmõz:transport#vaʼidmõ N_ÄʼGGÕZ   ; !"XX"
tsepītpan:tsepīt#pan N_PAN   ; !"XX"
tsikūoŗõz:tsikūoŗõ N_ARĀGÕZ   ; !"XX"
tsīedõrpēʼgõz:tsīedõr#pēʼgõ N_PŪʼDÕZ   ; !"XX"
tuoistõnd:tuoistõnd N_TUOISTÕNZ   ; !"XX"
täm:tam N_TÄM   ; !"tammi"
tīemīez:tīe#mīe N_MĪEZ   ; !"XX"
tōvaz:tōva N_TŌVAZ   ; !"XX"
tšoškībīšk:tšoškī#bīšk N_FAKT   ; !"XX"
tūʼgõtuš:tūʼgõ#tuš N_VIŠ   ; !"XX"
ulzeitmõd:ulz#ētam N_ĒTAM-PL   ; !"XX"
vatsātäuž:vatsā#täuž N_TÄUŽ   ; !"XX"
veis:veis N_VEIS   ; !"XX"
viltsīņtõblīʼedõd:viltsīņtõb#līʼed N_LĒʼḐ-PL   ; !"XX"
võikslimizkūož:võikslimiz#kūož N_JAĻKŠ   ; !"XX"
võrgõ:võrgõ N_VÕRGÕ   ; !"verkko"
võțīm:võțīm N_VÕȚĪM   ; !"XX"
vīetšõz:vīetšõ N_VĪETŠÕZ   ; !"XX"
vīkõd:vīk N_IRM-PL   ; !"XX"
vȭidag:vȭidag N_VȬIDAG   ; !"voi"
vȯļg:vȯļg N_VȮĻG   ; !"olki"
vȯʼddõrsūrmõd:vȯʼddõr#sūrmõ N_VȬRÕZ-PL   ; !"XX"
äʼbvȯņ:äʼb#vȯņ N_VȮŅ   ; !"XX"
õpkāz:õpkā N_NÕTKĀZ   ; !"XX"
āinadang:āinad#ang N_ANG   ; !"XX"
āinalipūk:āina#lipūk N_SIDĀM   ; !"XX"
āinalēʼḑ:āina#lēʼḑ N_LĒʼḐ   ; !"XX"
ēdrõmõd:ēdrõm N_KǬRAND-PL   ; !"XX"
ētam:ētam N_ĒTAM   ; !"XX"
ēzõ:ēzõ N_SIELDÕ   ; !"XX"
īekšõd:īekšõ N_AŠŠÕ-PL   ; !"XX"
īʼt:īʼt N_VAʼIT   ; !"XX"
škērõd:škērõ N_SIELDÕ-PL   ; !"XX"
ūrmarink:ūrma#rink N_KAND   ; !"XX"
žnougõd:žnougõ N_MÕTKÕZ-PL   ; !"XX"
